test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-plade_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
# kollat av Elina


  Noun - plade: # 7pl ade -- inte kontrollerad 
    afäärimies+N+Pl+Ade: afäärimiehilä
    eusmies+N+Pl+Ade: eusmiehilä
    frahtimies+N+Pl+Ade: frahtimiehilä
    hakkomies+N+Pl+Ade: hakkomiehilä
    ikämies+N+Pl+Ade: ikämiehilä
    irtimies+N+Pl+Ade: irtimiehilä
    iskemämies+N+Pl+Ade: iskemämiehilä
    elläin+N+Pl+Ade: elläimillä
    irtain+N+Pl+Ade: irtaimilla
    istuin+N+Pl+Ade: istuimilla
    jäänhalkein+N+Pl+Ade: jäänhalkeimilla
    jäsenyin+N+Pl+Ade: jäsenykimillä
    polkimet+N+Pl+Ade: polkimilla
    äänestys+N+Pl+Ade: äänestyksilä
    äärettömyys+N+Pl+Ade: äärettömyyksilä
    #äes+N+Pl+Ade: äkeksillä
    ähmäänys+N+Pl+Ade: ähmäänyksilä
    ajos+N+Pl+Ade: ajoksilla
    äkäsyys+N+Pl+Ade: äkäsyyksilä
    annos+N+Pl+Ade: annoksilla
    ahmajäsen+N+Pl+Ade: ahmajäsenillä
    ahven+N+Pl+Ade: ahvenilla
    askel+N+Pl+Ade: askelilla
    höyhen+N+Pl+Ade: höyhenillä
    isosisar+N+Pl+Ade: isosisarilla
    jääntanner+N+Pl+Ade: jääntanterilla
    jalkatyär+N+Pl+Ade: jalkatyttärillä
    ahneus+N+Pl+Ade: ahneuksilla
    falskeus+N+Pl+Ade: falskeuksilla
    fariseeus+N+Pl+Ade: fariseeuksilla
    fiineys+N+Pl+Ade: fiineyksillä
    fiiniys+N+Pl+Ade: fiiniyksillä
    ilfheys+N+Pl+Ade: ilfheyksillä
    ilkeys+N+Pl+Ade: ilkeyksillä
    jiddisch+N+Pl+Ade: jiddischillä
    -kielinen+N+Pl+Ade: -kielisillä
    äärheinen+N+Pl+Ade: äärheisillä
    ainukainen+N+Pl+Ade: ainukaisila
    ammuminen+N+Pl+Ade: ammumisila
    ampiainen+N+Pl+Ade: ampiaisila
    ästiitiäinen+N+Pl+Ade: ästiitiäisilä
    äykiäinen+N+Pl+Ade: äykiäisilä
    aavistus+N+Pl+Ade: aavistuksila
    ahistus+N+Pl+Ade: ahistuksila
    aivastus+N+Pl+Ade: aivastuksila
    ajatus+N+Pl+Ade: ajatuksila
    anomus+N+Pl+Ade: anomuksila
    arvaus+N+Pl+Ade: arvauksilla
    astutus+N+Pl+Ade: astutuksila
    aamuvyö+N+Pl+Ade: aamuvöilä
    äkäpää+N+Pl+Ade: äkäpäilä
    äkkipää+N+Pl+Ade: äkkipäilä
    ärräpää+N+Pl+Ade: ärräpäilä
    asepuu+N+Pl+Ade: asepuila
    mäkivyöt+N+Pl+Ade: mäkivöilä
    takkaa-ajo+N+Pl+Ade: takkaa-ajoila
    a-malmi+N+Pl+Ade: [a-malmila, a-malmeila]
    ääkkä+N+Pl+Ade: ääkilä
    aalto+N+Pl+Ade: aaloila
    abortti+N+Pl+Ade: [abortila, abortteila]
    aho+N+Pl+Ade: ahoila
    äijäfaari+N+Pl+Ade: [äijäfaarila, äijäfaareila]
    hamut+N+Pl+Ade: hamuila
    aihe+N+Pl+Ade: aihheila
    äile+N+Pl+Ade: [äilheilä, äihleilä]
    aine+N+Pl+Ade: [ainheila, aihneila]
    alote+N+Pl+Ade: alotheila
    alue+N+Pl+Ade: aluheila
    ikenheet+N+Pl+Ade: [ikenheilä, ikehneilä]
    akleija+N+Pl+Ade: akleijoila
    äkseerinki+N+Pl+Ade: [äkseeringilä, äkseerinkeilä]
    almunakka+N+Pl+Ade: almunakoila
    alttari+N+Pl+Ade: [alttarilla, alttareila]
    ämmäkkö+N+Pl+Ade: ämmäköilä
    #ammunta+N+Pl+Ade: ammunoila
    kamari+N+Pl+Ade: [kamarilla, kamareila]
    ääri+N+Pl+Ade: äärilä
    äitiväki+N+Pl+Ade: äitiväilä
    ehontähti+N+Pl+Ade: ehontähilä
    ehtotähti+N+Pl+Ade: ehtotähilä
    elämänonni+N+Pl+Ade: elämänonnila
    epiteemi+N+Pl+Ade: epiteemilä
    kuunvuoret+N+Pl+Ade: kuunvuorila
    äitinkieli+N+Pl+Ade: äitinkielilä
    äitipuoli+N+Pl+Ade: äitipuolila
    asuntolohi+N+Pl+Ade: asuntolohila
    hiili+N+Pl+Ade: hiililä
    aikakausi+N+Pl+Ade: aikakausila
    färivesi+N+Pl+Ade: färivesilä
    hangonvarsi+N+Pl+Ade: hangonvarsila
    hirsi+N+Pl+Ade: hirsilä
    ikävuosi+N+Pl+Ade: ikävuosila
    ilovesi+N+Pl+Ade: ilovesilä
    polvivarsi+N+Pl+Ade: polvivarsila
    imulapsi+N+Pl+Ade: imulapsila
    irtilapsi+N+Pl+Ade: irtilapsila
    jalkalapsi+N+Pl+Ade: jalkalapsila
    jumalanlapsi+N+Pl+Ade: jumalanlapsila
    kapalolapsi+N+Pl+Ade: kapalolapsila
    kasvattilapsi+N+Pl+Ade: kasvattilapsila
    kusilapsi+N+Pl+Ade: kusilapsila
    höttölumi+N+Pl+Ade: höttölumila
    iloliemi+N+Pl+Ade: iloliemilä
    kalanliemi+N+Pl+Ade: kalanliemilä
    kankhaanloimi+N+Pl+Ade: kankhaanloimila
    lähetystoimi+N+Pl+Ade: lähetystoimila
    liemi+N+Pl+Ade: liemilä
    ympäryssuoli+N+Pl+Ade: ympäryssuolila
    auttavaisuus+N+Pl+Ade: auttavaisuuksila
    hankaluus+N+Pl+Ade: hankaluuksila
    hiljasuus+N+Pl+Ade: hiljasuuksila
    huoruus+N+Pl+Ade: huoruuksilla
    iänkaikkisuus+N+Pl+Ade: iänkaikkisuuksila
    itusuus+N+Pl+Ade: itusuuksila
    jatkuvuus+N+Pl+Ade: jatkuvuuksila
    evankeeljum+N+Pl+Ade: evankeeljumila
    lippanen+N+Pl+Ade: lippasilla
    Antinpäivä+N+Pl+Ade: Antinpäivilä
    Kruunu+N+Pl+Ade: Kruunuila
    Kyriiri+N+Pl+Ade: [Kyriirillä, Kyriireilä]
    #Laurina+N+Pl+Ade: Laurinaila
    tavara+N+Pl+Ade: tavaroila
    Mikkelinpäivä+N+Pl+Ade: Mikkelinpäivilä
    norrlänska+N+Pl+Ade: norrlänskoila
    TV-masti+N+Pl+Ade: [TV-mastila, TV-masteila]
    äänensävy+N+Pl+Ade: äänensävyilä
    alunastifti+N+Pl+Ade: [alunastiftilä, alunastifteilä]
    romani chib+N+Pl+Ade: romani chibilä
